Maryland, session 2025, SB0294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–2901.
(b) There is a Maryland Cybersecurity Council.
(c) The Council consists of the following members:
(1) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of State Police, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Adjutant General, or the Adjutant General’s designee;
(6) the State Administrator of Elections, or the State Administrator’s
designee;
(7) the Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Homeland Security,
or the Executive Director’s designee;
(8) the Director of the Maryland Coordination and Analysis Center, or the
Director’s designee;

SENATE BILL 294 3
(9) the Secretary of Emergency Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(10) THE PEOPLE’S COUNSEL, OR THE DESIGNEE OF THE PEOPLE’S
COUNSEL;
(11) the Chief Executive Officer of the Maryland Technology Development
Corporation, or the Chief Executive Officer’s designee;
(11) (12) the Chair of the Tech Council of Maryland, or the Chair’s
designee;
(12) (13) the President of the Fort Meade Alliance, or the President’s
designee;
(13) (14) the President of the Army Alliance, or the President’s designee;
and
(14) (15) the following members appointed by the [Attorney General]
GOVERNOR:
(i) five FOUR representatives of cybersecurity companies located in
the State, with at least three representing cybersecurity companies with 50 or fewer
employees, DESIGNATED BY THE CYBERSECURITY ASSOCIATION OF MARYLAND;
(ii) four representatives from statewide or regional business
associations;
(16) THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CHAMBER
OF COMMERCE, OR THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE;
(17) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE CYBERSECURITY
ASSOCIATION OF MARYLAND, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(iii) up to ten
(18) EIGHT NINE representatives from institutions of higher education
located in the State WITH EXPERTISE IN CYBERSECURITY, WITH AT LEAST FOUR
REPRESENTATIVES WITH EXPERTISE IN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND QUANTUM
COMPUTING, INCLUDING:
(I) THE PRESIDENT, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE, OF:
1. BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY;

SENATE BILL 294
2. JOHNS HOPKINS UNIVERSITY;
3. MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY;
4. THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE
CAMPUS;
5. THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE
COUNTY; AND
6. THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK
CAMPUS; AND
(II) THE DEAN OF THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND GLOBAL
CAMPUS SCHOOL OF CYBERSECURITY AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, OR THE
DEAN’S DESIGNEE; AND
(II) TWO ADDITIONAL REPRESENTATIVES DESIGNATED BY THE
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND, WITH DUE CONSIDERATION OF GEOGRAPHIC
DIVERSITY;
(III) TWO ADDITIONAL REPRESENTATIVES DESIGNATED BY THE
CHANCELLOR OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND;
(iv) one representative of a crime victims organization;
(v) four representatives from industries that may be susceptible to
attacks on cybersecurity, including at least one representative of a bank, whether or not
State–chartered, that has a branch in the State;
(vi) two representatives of organizations that have expertise in
electronic health care records; and
(19) THE DIRECTOR OF CASH CAMPAIGN OF MARYLAND, OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(20) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF ECONOMIC ACTION MARYLAND,
OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(21) ONE BANK CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER, DESIGNATED
BY THE MARYLAND BANKERS ASSOCIATION;
(22) ONE HOSPITAL CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER,
DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION;

SENATE BILL 294 5
(23) ONE WATER SYSTEMS CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER
WHO WORKS FOR A WATER SYSTEM LOCATED IN THE STATE, DESIGNATED BY THE
NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF WATER COMPANIES;
(24) ONE ELECTRIC COMPANY CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY
OFFICER WHO WORKS IN THE STATE FOR AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVING
CUSTOMERS IN THE STATE, DESIGNATED BY THE EDISON ELECTRIC INSTITUTE;
(25) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE ELECTRONIC PRIVACY
INFORMATION CENTER, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(26) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTER FOR DEMOCRACY
AND TECHNOLOGY, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(27) THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE TECHNOLOGY
ADVANCEMENT CENTER, OR THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE;
(28) THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTER FOR GOVERNANCE OF
TECHNOLOGY AND SYSTEMS, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE; AND
(vii) (29) any other stakeholder that the [Attorney General]
GOVERNOR CHAIR determines appropriate.
(f) The [Attorney General] GOVERNOR CHAIR also shall invite, as appropriate,
the following representatives of federal agencies to serve on the Council:
(1) the Director of the National Security Agency, or the Director’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of Homeland Security, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Director of the Defense Information Systems Agency, or the
Director’s designee;
(4) THE DIRECTOR OF THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE FOR SCIENCE AND
TECHNOLOGY, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(5) the Director of the Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity, or
the Director’s designee; and
(5) (6) any other federal agency that the Attorney General CHAIR
determines appropriate.
[(g) The Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee, shall chair the
Council.]

SENATE BILL 294
(G) (1) BEGINNING SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE COUNCIL
SHALL ELECT A CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR FROM AMONG THE MEMBERS OF THE
COUNCIL.
(2) ONE SHALL BE A STATE EMPLOYEE AND ONE SHALL BE A
NON–STATE EMPLOYEE.
(j) The Council shall work with the National Institute of Standards and
Technology and other federal agencies, private sector businesses, NONPROFITS, and
private cybersecurity experts to ASSESS AND ADDRESS CYBERSECURITY THREATS AND
ASSOCIATED RISKS FROM ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND QUANTUM COMPUTING
TO:
(1) for critical infrastructure [not covered by federal law or the Executive
Order], review and conduct risk assessments to determine which local infrastructure
sectors are at the greatest risk of cyber attacks and need the most enhanced cybersecurity
measures;
(2) use federal guidance to identify categories of critical infrastructure as
critical cyber infrastructure if cyber damage or unauthorized cyber access to the
infrastructure could reasonably result in catastrophic consequences, including:
(i) interruption in the provision of energy, water, transportation,
emergency services, food, or other life–sustaining services sufficient to cause a mass
casualty event or mass evacuations;
(ii) catastrophic economic damage; or
(iii) severe degradation of State or national security;
(3) assist infrastructure entities that are not covered by the Executive
Order in complying with federal cybersecurity guidance;
(4) assist private sector cybersecurity businesses in adopting, adapting,
and implementing the National Institute of Standards and Technology cybersecurity
framework of standards and practices;
(5) examine inconsistencies between State and federal laws regarding
cybersecurity;
(6) recommend a comprehensive State strategic plan to ensure a
coordinated and adaptable response to and recovery from cybersecurity attacks; [and]

SENATE BILL 294 7
(7) ADDRESS SENSITIVE PRIVACY INTERESTS OF STATE RESIDENTS
RELATED TO CYBERSECURITY AND ASSOCIATED RISKS;
(8) ADDRESS EMERGING THREATS POSED BY ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, INCLUDING:
(I) ADVERSARIAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(II) CYBER ATTACKS;
(III) DEEPFAKE TECHNOLOGIES;
(IV) UNETHICAL USE; AND
(V) FRAUD; AND
[(7)] (9) recommend any legislative changes considered necessary by the
Council to address cybersecurity issues.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the Maryland Cybersecurity Council reviews and adjusts its subcommittee
structure, if necessary, and implements appropriate bylaws of operation consistent with
State law by December 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.